Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,180
Appropriations; use.

(1) Funds appropriated for fiscal year 2000-01 and each fiscal year thereafter before fiscal year 2007-08 for the Minority Scholarship Program Act as it existed immediately prior to July 1, 2007, shall be used for the benefit of students pursuant to the Minority Scholarship Program Act at the University of Nebraska, the state colleges, and the community colleges.

(2) Funds appropriated for fiscal year 2007-08 and each fiscal year thereafter for the Student Diversity Scholarship Program Act shall be used for the benefit of students pursuant to the Student Diversity Scholarship Program Act at the University of Nebraska, the state colleges, and the community colleges.

Laws 2000, LB 1379, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB342, § 35.